District of Columbia statutes.
31-4110

Administrative and procedural authority regarding risk retention groups and purchasing groups.

The Commissioner is authorized to make use of any of the powers established under the Insurance Code of the District of Columbia to enforce the laws of the District of Columbia not specifically preempted by the federal Liability Risk Retention Act of 1986 (15 U.S.C. § 3901 et seq.), including the Commissioner’s administrative authority to investigate, issue subpoenas, conduct depositions and hearings, issue orders, impose penalties, and seek injunctive relief. With regard to any investigation, administrative proceedings, or litigation, the Commissioner can rely on the procedural laws of the District. The injunctive authority of the Commissioner, in regard to risk retention groups, is restricted by the requirement that any injunction be issued by a court of competent jurisdiction.

History

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-46, § 11, 40 DCR 6082
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 41, 44 DCR 1271
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(aa)(2), 44 DCR 1730

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-2910.